Washington statutes.
RCW 36.78.080

Members to serve without compensation—Reimbursement for travel expenses.

Members of the county road administration board shall receive no compensation for their service on the board, but shall be reimbursed for travel expenses incurred while attending meetings of the board or while engaged on other business of the board when authorized by the board in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060 as now existing or hereafter amended.

[1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 34 s 80; 1975 1st ex.s. c 1 s 1; 1969 ex.s. c 182 s 5; 1965 ex.s. c 120 s 8.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Severability—1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 34: See notes following RCW 2.08.115.